Utah statutes.
72-10-207.   Powers of department and political subdivisions over airports
-- Security unit.
(1)  The department, and counties, municipalities, or other political
subdivisions of this state that have established or may establish airports or
that acquire, lease, or set apart real property for those purposes, may:
(a)  construct, equip, improve, maintain, and operate the airports or may vest
the authority for their construction, equipment, improvement, maintenance, and
operation in an officer of the department or in an officer, board, or body of
the political subdivision;
(b)  adopt rules, establish charges, fees, and tolls for the use of airports
and landing fields, fix penalties for the violation of the rules, and
establish liens to enforce payment of the charges, fees, and tolls, subject to
approval by the commission;
(c)  lease the airports to private parties for operation for a term not
exceeding 50 years, as long as the public is not deprived of its rightful,
equal, and uniform use of the facility;
(d)  lease or assign space, area, improvements, equipment, buildings, and
facilities on the airports to private parties for operation for a term not
exceeding 50 years;
(e)  lease or assign real property comprising all or any part of the airports
to private parties for the construction and operation of hangars, shop
buildings, or office buildings for a term not exceeding 50 years, if the
projected construction cost of the hangar, shop building, or office building
is $100,000 or more; and
(f)  establish, maintain, operate, and staff a security unit for the purpose
of enforcing state and local laws at any airport that is subject to federal
airport security regulations.
(2)  The department or political subdivision shall pay the construction,
equipment, improvement, maintenance, and operations expenses of any airport
established by them under Subsection (1).
(3) (a)  If the department or political subdivision establishes a security
unit under Subsection (1)(f), the department head or the governing body of the
political subdivision shall appoint persons qualified as peace officers under
Title 53, Chapter 13, Peace Officer Classifications to staff the security
unit.
(b)  A security unit appointed by the department or political subdivision is
exempt from civil service regulations.
